New York, session 2025-2026, A4059.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public buildings law is amended by adding a new section 2 148 to read as follows: 3 § 148. Bins for recyclable and compostable materials. A covered 4 public building shall establish and implement a program for the 5 collection of recyclable and compostable materials that are discarded in 6 such building. Such recyclable materials shall include, but not be 7 limited to, metal, plastic, glass and paper. Such compostable materials 8 shall include, but not be limited to, food scraps, tree and brush trim- 9 mings, leaves, and other compostable materials. In each such building 10 there shall be installed bins for the collection of recyclable materials 11 and bins for the collection of compostable materials. Such bins shall 12 be alongside any undesignated waste bins and any bins for non-recycla- 13 ble, non-compostable waste. A bin designated for recyclable materials 14 shall be regularly collected and the recyclable materials within recy- 15 cled. A bin designated for compostable materials shall be regularly 16 collected and the contents within composted. 17 § 2. Subdivision 23 of section 3.09 of the parks, recreation and 18 historic preservation law, as added by chapter 312 of the laws of 2017, 19 is amended to read as follows: 20 23. Establish and implement a program for the collection of recyclable 21 and compostable materials that are discarded in state parks, state 22 historic sites and state recreational facilities. Such recyclable mate- 23 rials shall include, but not be limited to, metal, plastic, glass and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04742-01-5 A. 4059 2 1 paper. Such compostable materials shall include, but not be limited to, 2 food scraps, tree and brush trimmings, leaves, and other compostable 3 materials. In each such park, historic site and recreational facility 4 the office shall install bins for the collection of recyclable materials 5 and bins for the collection of compostable materials. Such bins shall be 6 alongside any undesignated waste bins and any bins for non-recyclable, 7 non-compostable waste. The office shall regularly collect and provide 8 for the recycling of the recyclable materials collected and shall regu- 9 larly collect and provide for the composting of compostable materials 10 collected. 11 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 12 it shall have become a law.